District of Columbia statutes.
2-824

Permits for use of federal grounds and reservations.

The Secretary of the Interior, with the approval of such officer as may exercise jurisdiction over any of the federal reservations or grounds in the District of Columbia, is authorized to grant to the Inaugural Committee permits for the use of such reservations or grounds during the inaugural period, including a reasonable time prior and subsequent thereto; and the Mayor is authorized to grant like permits for the use of public space under his jurisdiction. Each such permit shall be subject to such restrictions, terms, and conditions as may be imposed by the grantor of such permit. With respect to public space, no reviewing stand or any stand or structure for the sale of goods, wares, merchandise, food, or drink shall be built on any sidewalk, street, park, reservation, or other public grounds in the District of Columbia, except with the approval of the Inaugural Committee, and with the approval of the Secretary of the Interior or the Mayor, as the case may be, depending on the location of such stand or structure. The reservation, ground, or public space occupied by any such stand or structure shall, after the inaugural period, be promptly restored to its previous condition. The Inaugural Committee shall indemnify and save harmless the District of Columbia and the appropriate agency or agencies of the federal government against any loss or damage to such property and against any liability arising from the use of such property, either by the Inaugural Committee or a licensee of the Inaugural Committee.

Aug. 6, 1956, 70 Stat. 1049, ch. 974, § 4
1981 Ed., § 1-1804.
1973 Ed., § 1-1204.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.